New York, session 2025-2026, A1962.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as
"Francesco's law".
§ 2. Section 265.45 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 371 of
the laws of 2022 and subdivision 2 as amended by section 3 of part F of
chapter 55 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows:
§ 265.45 Failure to safely store rifles, shotguns, and firearms [in the
first degree].
1. No person who owns or is custodian of a rifle, shotgun or firearm
[who resides with an individual who: (i) is under eighteen years of age;
(ii) such person knows or has reason to know is prohibited from possess-
ing a rifle, shotgun or firearm pursuant to a temporary or final extreme
risk protection order issued under article sixty-three-A of the civil
practice law and rules or 18 U.S.C. § 922(g) (1), (4), (8) or (9); or
(iii) such person knows or has reason to know is prohibited from
possessing a rifle, shotgun or firearm based on a conviction for a felo-
ny or a serious offense,] shall store or otherwise leave such rifle,
shotgun or firearm out of [his or her] such person's immediate
possession or control without having first securely locked such rifle,
shotgun or firearm in an appropriate safe storage depository or rendered
it incapable of being fired by use of a gun locking device appropriate
to that weapon.
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD05011-03-5

A. 1962--A 2
2. No person shall store or otherwise leave a rifle, shotgun, or
firearm out of such person's immediate possession or control inside a
vehicle without first removing the ammunition from and securely locking
such rifle, shotgun, or firearm in an appropriate safe storage deposito-
ry out of sight from outside of the vehicle; provided, however, this
subdivision shall not apply to a police officer as such term is defined
in subdivision thirty-four of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure
law, a qualified law enforcement officer authorized to carry concealed
firearms pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 926B, or a person in the military service
of the United States or the state of New York when such police officer,
qualified law enforcement officer, or person in such military service is
acting in the course of such person's official duty or employment and
otherwise complying with any applicable standards or requirements
pertaining to the storage of such rifle, shotgun, or firearm.
3. For purposes of this section "safe storage depository" shall mean a
safe or other secure container which, when locked, is incapable of being
opened without the key, keypad, combination or other unlocking mechanism
and is capable of preventing an unauthorized person from obtaining
access to and possession of the weapon contained therein and shall be
fire, impact, and tamper resistant. Nothing in this section shall be
deemed to affect, impair or supersede any special or local act relating
to the safe storage of rifles, shotguns or firearms which impose addi-
tional requirements on the owner or custodian of such weapons. For the
purposes of subdivision two of this section, a glove compartment or
glove box shall not be considered an appropriate safe storage deposito-
ry.
[4. It shall not be a violation of this section to allow a person less
than eighteen years of age access to: (i) a firearm, rifle or shotgun
for lawful use as authorized under paragraph seven or seven-e of subdi-
vision a of section 265.20 of this article, or (ii) a rifle or shotgun
for lawful use as authorized by article eleven of the environmental
conservation law when such person less than eighteen years of age is the
holder of a hunting license or permit and such rifle or shotgun is used
in accordance with such law.]
Failure to safely store rifles, shotguns, and firearms [in the first
degree] is [a class A misdemeanor]:
(i) for a first offense, a violation;
(ii) for a second offense, a class B misdemeanor; and
(iii) for a third offense, a class A misdemeanor.
§ 3. Section 265.46 of the penal law is REPEALED.
§ 4. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 265.51 to read
as follows:
§ 265.51 Failure to safely store rifles, shotguns, and firearms when
accessible by a minor or prohibited person in the third
degree.
1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have
the following meanings:
(a) "prohibited person" shall mean any person who is prohibited from
possessing a rifle, shotgun or firearm under state or federal law; and
(b) "minor" shall mean an individual under eighteen years of age.
2. A person is guilty of failure to safely store rifles, shotguns, and
firearms accessible to a minor or a prohibited person in the third
degree when:
(a) such person stores or otherwise leaves any rifle, shotgun or
firearm in violation of section 265.45 of this article in any location
where the owner or custodian of the rifle, shotgun, or firearm knows or

A. 1962--A 3
has reason to know that a minor or a prohibited person is likely to gain
access to such rifle, shotgun or firearm; and
(b) a minor or a prohibited person gains access to such rifle, shotgun
or firearm.
3. It shall not be a violation of this section:
(a) if the minor or prohibited person obtained the firearm, rifle, or
shotgun as a result of unlawful entry by any person; or
(b) if the minor or prohibited person obtains the firearm, rifle, or
shotgun in a lawful act of self-defense or defense of another person.
Failure to safely store rifles, shotguns, and firearms when accessible
by a minor or prohibited person in the third degree is a class A misde-
meanor.
§ 5. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 265.52 to read
as follows:
§ 265.52 Failure to safely store rifles, shotguns, and firearms when
accessible by a minor or prohibited person in the second
degree.
1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have
the following meanings:
(a) "prohibited person" shall mean any person who is prohibited from
possessing a rifle, shotgun or firearm under state or federal law; and
(b) "minor" shall mean an individual under eighteen years of age.
2. A person is guilty of failure to safely store rifles, shotguns, and
firearms accessible to a minor or a prohibited person in the second
degree when:
(a) such person recklessly stores or otherwise leaves any rifle, shot-
gun or firearm in violation of section 265.45 of this article in any
location where the owner or custodian of the rifle, shotgun, or firearm
knows or has reason to know that a minor or a prohibited person is like-
ly to gain access to such rifle, shotgun or firearm; and
(b) a minor or a prohibited person gains access to such rifle, shotgun
or firearm and uses it to injure themselves or another in the commission
of a crime.
3. It shall not be a violation of this section:
(a) if the minor or prohibited person obtained the firearm, rifle, or
shotgun as a result of unlawful entry by any person; or
(b) if the minor or prohibited person obtains the firearm, rifle, or
shotgun in a lawful act of self-defense or defense of another person.
Failure to safely store rifles, shotguns, and firearms when accessible
by a minor or prohibited person in the second degree is a class D felo-
ny.
§ 6. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 265.53 to read
as follows:
§ 265.53 Failure to safely store rifles, shotguns, and firearms when
accessible by a minor or prohibited person in the first
degree.
1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have
the following meanings:
(a) "prohibited person" shall mean any person who is prohibited from
possessing a rifle, shotgun or firearm under state or federal law; and
(b) "minor" shall mean an individual under eighteen years of age.
2. A person is guilty of failure to safely store rifles, shotguns, and
firearms accessible to a minor or a prohibited person in the first
degree when:
(a) such person recklessly stores or otherwise leaves any rifle, shot-
gun or firearm in violation of section 265.45 of this article in any

A. 1962--A 4
location where the owner or custodian of the rifle, shotgun, or firearm
knows or has reason to know that a minor or a prohibited person is like-
ly to gain access to such rifle, shotgun or firearm; and
(b) a minor or a prohibited person gains access to such rifle, shotgun
or firearm and uses it to cause the death of themselves or another
person.
3. It shall not be a violation of this section:
(a) if the minor or prohibited person obtained the firearm, rifle, or
shotgun as a result of unlawful entry by any person; or
(b) if the minor or prohibited person obtains the firearm, rifle, or
shotgun in a lawful act of self-defense or defense of another person.
Failure to safely store rifles, shotguns, and firearms when accessible
by a minor or prohibited person in the first degree is a class C felony.
§ 7. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however,
sections two, three, four, five, and six of this act shall take effect
on the ninetieth day after it shall have become a law.